Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-164.03
Use of title accountant; not prohibited.

Nothing in the Public Accountancy Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act shall be construed to prohibit a person not holding a certificate or permit from using the title accountant in his or her business practices.

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 24;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 58.